Hawaii statutes.
§383-69 Procedure for rate determination.
The department of labor and industrial relations, as soon as is reasonably
possible in each period, shall make its classification of employers for the
period and notify each employer of the employer's rate of contributions for the
period as determined pursuant to sections 383-63 to 383-69. The determination
shall become conclusive and binding upon the employer unless the employer
appeals the determination by filing a written notice of appeal within fifteen
days after the mailing of notice of the determination to the employer's last
known address. The appeal shall be heard by the referee in accordance with
applicable provisions of sections 383-38 and 383-39 but no employer shall have
standing, in any proceeding involving the employer's rate of contributions or
contribution liability, to contest the chargeability to the employer's account
of any benefits paid in accordance with a determination, redetermination, or
decision pursuant to sections 383-31 to 383-43; provided that the services on
the basis of which the benefits were found to be chargeable did not constitute
services performed in employment for the employer and only if the employer was
not a party to the determination, redetermination, or decision, or to any other
proceedings under this chapter in which the character of the services was
determined. The referee's determination shall become final unless a proceeding
for judicial review in the manner provided in chapter 91 is commenced in the
circuit court of the judicial circuit in which the employer resides or has the
employer's principal place of business or in the circuit court of the first
judicial circuit. An appeal may be taken from the decision of the circuit
court to the intermediate appellate court, subject to chapter 602. [L 1941, c
304, §1, pt of subs 21; RL 1945, §4254; RL 1955, §93-68; am L 1965, c 96, §72;
HRS §383-69; am L 1975, c 41, §1; gen ch 1985; am L 2004, c 202, §40; am L
2006, c 94, §1; am L 2010, c 109, §1; am L 2012, c 13, §1]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next